Hawaii statutes.
Rule 603 Oath or affirmation. Before
testifying, every witness shall be required to declare that the witness will
testify truthfully, by oath or affirmation administered in a form calculated to
awaken the witness' conscience and impress the witness' mind with the witness'
duty to do so. [L 1980, c 164, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

RULE 603 COMMENTARY

This rule is identical with Fed. R. Evid. 603. Its
intent is to retain the common-law requirement that a witness must solemnly
undertake to tell the truth. As the Advisory Committee's Note to Fed. R. Evid.
603 puts it: "[N]o special verbal formula is required."

Although under early common law, refusal of a witness to
affirm his belief in a supreme being or to invoke the deity according to a
specified formulary oath rendered him incompetent, modern law is contrary. In
United States v. Looper, 419 F.2d 1405, 1407 (4th Cir. 1969), the court said:
"The common law...requires neither an appeal to God nor the raising of a
hand as a prerequisite to a valid oath. All that the common law requires is a
form or statement which impresses upon the mind and conscience of a witness the
necessity for telling the truth."

The liberal requirement for an "oath or
affirmation" is broadly consistent with Hawaii law. Hawaii Rev. Stat.
§1-21 (1976) provides that "[t]he word 'oath' includes a solemn
affirmation." A prior statute, superseded by this rule, stated:
"Every court...may administer the following oath-affirmation to all
witnesses legally called before them: Do you solemnly swear or affirm that the
testimony you are about to give will be the truth, the whole truth and nothing
but the truth?" Hawaii Rev. Stat. §621-12 (1976) (repealed 1980)
(originally enacted as L 1876, c 32, §48; am L 1973, c 155, §1). In State v. Ponteras,
44 H. 71, 75, 351 P.2d 1097, 1100 (1960), the court, in determining the issue
of the sufficiency of an oath administered to a minor, stated: "No
particular words are required in exacting the declaration or promise from a
child to tell the truth."

The rule is also in accord with Hawaii's statutes on
perjury. Hawaii Rev. Stat. §§710-1060 through 710-1062 (1976) all proscribe
false statements under oath, and Hawaii Rev. Stat. §710-1000(10) (1976) defines
"oath" for the purposes of these statutes: "'Oath' includes an
affirmation and every other mode authorized by law of attesting to the truth of
that which is stated...." In addition, Hawaii Rev. Stat. §710-1068 (1976)
provides that it is no defense that "the oath was administered or taken in
an irregular manner."

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next